Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 15.1 Emergency Location of State Government

30-15.1-1.
Declaration — Transition of affairs.

Whenever, due to an emergency resulting from the effects of a disaster, or the anticipated effects of a potential disaster, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient, or impossible to conduct the affairs of state government at the normal location of the seat thereof in the city of Providence, county of Providence, state of Rhode Island, the governor shall, as often as the exigencies of the situation require, by executive order or proclamation, declare an emergency temporary location, or locations, for the seat of government at such a place, or places, within or without this state as he or she may deem advisable under the circumstances, and shall take such action and issue such orders as may be necessary for an orderly transition of the affairs of state government to that emergency temporary location or locations. The emergency temporary location, or locations, shall remain as the seat of government until the general assembly shall by law establish a new location, or locations, or until the emergency is declared to be ended by the governor and the seat of government is returned to its normal location.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 4.

30-15.1-2.
Validity of acts performed at emergency location.

During the time the seat of government remains at the emergency temporary location, or locations, all official acts now or hereafter required by law to be performed at the seat of government by any officer, agency, or department of authority of this state, including the convening and meeting of the general assembly in regular, extraordinary, or emergency session, shall be as valid and binding when performed at the emergency temporary location, or locations, as if performed at the normal location of the seat of government.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-15.1-2

; P.L. 1963, ch. 17, § 1.

30-15.1-3.
Chapter controlling.

The provisions of this chapter shall control and be supreme in the event it shall be employed, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary or in conflict herewith.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

30-15.1-3

; P.L. 1963, ch. 17, § 1.